Indiana, session 2026, HB1219.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-28.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 28.5. "Child care employee", for purposes of
IC 12-17.2-7.2, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-17.2-7.2-0.5.
IC 12-14-31, means an individual who:
(1) receives compensation as a full-time employee of an entity
licensed or regulated under IC 12-17.2, as determined by the
office of the secretary of family and social services; or
(2) receives compensation as a part-time employee of an entity
licensed or regulated under IC 12-17.2 while also pursuing
postsecondary study or educational training in child care or
early childhood education, as determined by the office of the
secretary of family and social services.
SECTION 2. IC 12-7-2-31.4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 31.4. "Child of a child care employee", for purposes of
IC 12-17.2-7.2, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-17.2-7.2-0.6.
SECTION 3. IC 12-7-2-79.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 79.5. "Expansion fund", for purposes of
IC 12-17.2-7.2, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-17.2-7.2-2.1.
SECTION 4. IC 12-7-2-91, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 91. "Fund" means the following:
(1) For purposes of IC 12-12-1-9, the fund described in
IC 12-12-1-9.
(2) For purposes of IC 12-15-20, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-20-1.
(3) For purposes of IC 12-17-12, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17-12-4.
(4) For purposes of IC 12-17.2-7.2, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.2-7.2-4.7.
(5) (4) For purposes of IC 12-17.6, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.6-1-3.
(6) (5) For purposes of IC 12-21-9, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-21-9-1.
(7) (6) For purposes of IC 12-23-2, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-23-2-1.
(8) (7) For purposes of IC 12-23-18, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-23-18-4.
(9) (8) For purposes of IC 12-24-6, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-24-6-1.
(10) (9) For purposes of IC 12-24-14, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-24-14-1.
(11) (10) For purposes of IC 12-30-7, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-30-7-3.
SECTION 5. IC 12-7-2-143.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 143.3. "Prekindergarten fund",
for purposes of IC 12-17.2-7.2, has the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.2-7.2-4.7.
SECTION 6. IC 12-14-31-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 110, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A household that, at the time of
the office of the secretary's initial determination of the household's
income eligibility for purposes of entry into the CCDF program:
(1) subject to federal law, has a parent or guardian who is working
or attending a job training or an educational program;
(2) has a household income that does not exceed eighty-five
percent (85%) of Indiana's state median income for the
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


household's family size;
(3) includes a child care employee; (as defined in
IC 12-17.2-7.2-0.5); and
(4) otherwise meets federal eligibility requirements for the CCDF
program;
is eligible for assistance under the CCDF program.
SECTION 7. IC 12-17.2-7.2-0.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, "child care employee"
means an individual who:
(1) receives compensation as a full-time employee of an entity
licensed or regulated under this article, as determined by the
office; or
(2) receives compensation as a part-time employee of an entity
licensed or regulated under this article while also pursuing
postsecondary study or educational training in child care or early
childhood education, as determined by the office.
SECTION 8. IC 12-17.2-7.2-0.6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 0.6. As used in this chapter, "child of a child care
employee" means an individual who:
(1) is at least four (4) years of age and less than five (5) years of
age on August 1 of the state fiscal year for which a
prekindergarten voucher is sought for the individual under the
prekindergarten program;
(2) is a resident of Indiana or otherwise has legal settlement in
Indiana, as determined under IC 20-26-11;
(3) receives qualified early education services from an eligible
provider, as determined by the office;
(4) has a parent or guardian who agrees to ensure that the child
meets the attendance requirements determined by the office;
(5) resides with a parent or guardian who is a child care
employee, as determined by the office;
(6) has a household income that does not exceed eighty-five
percent (85%) of Indiana's state median income for the
household's family size; and
(7) meets the requirements of section 7.2(c) of this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 12-17.2-7.2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 121, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "eligible
child" refers to an individual who:
(1) in the case of an individual who is enrolled before May 1,
2025:
(A) is at least four (4) years of age and less than five (5) years
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


of age on August 1 of the state fiscal year for which a grant is
sought under the prekindergarten program;
(B) is a resident of Indiana or otherwise has legal settlement in
Indiana, as determined under IC 20-26-11;
(C) is a member of a household with an annual income that
does not exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the
federal poverty level;
(D) (C) receives qualified early education services from an
eligible provider, as determined by the office;
(E) (D) has a parent or guardian who participates in a parental
engagement and involvement component provided by the
eligible provider;
(F) (E) has a parent or guardian who agrees to ensure that the
child meets the attendance requirements determined by the
office; and
(G) (F) meets the requirements under section 7.2(a) and 7.2(c)
7.2(b) of this chapter; and
(2) in the case of an individual who is enrolled on or after May 1,
2025:
(A) is at least four (4) years of age and less than five (5) years
of age on August 1 of the state fiscal year for which a grant is
sought under the prekindergarten program;
(B) is a resident of Indiana or otherwise has legal settlement in
Indiana, as determined under IC 20-26-11;
(C) is a member of a household with an annual income that
does not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the
federal poverty level;
(D) (C) receives qualified early education services from an
eligible provider, as determined by the office;
(E) (D) has a parent or guardian who participates in a parental
engagement and involvement component provided by the
eligible provider;
(F) (E) has a parent or guardian who agrees to ensure that the
child meets the attendance requirements determined by the
office; and
(G) (F) meets the requirements under section 7.2(a) and 7.2(c)
7.2(b) of this chapter.
SECTION 10. IC 12-17.2-7.2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "eligible provider"
refers to a provider that satisfies the following conditions:
(1) The provider is:
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


(A) a:
(i) child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4;
(ii) child care home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5; or
(iii) child care ministry registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
that meets the standards of quality recognized by a Level 3 or
Level 4 paths to QUALITY program rating;
(B) a public school, including a charter school;
(C) a nonpublic school that is accredited by the state board of
education or a national or regional accreditation agency that is
recognized by the state board of education; or
(D) a nonpublic school that is accredited to provide qualified
early education services by an accrediting agency approved by
the office of the secretary.
(2) The provider:
(A) provides qualified early education services to eligible
children; limited eligibility children, and children of child care
employees;
(B) complies with the agreement with the office concerning
the delivery of qualified education services and the use of a
prekindergarten voucher provided under this chapter; and
(C) complies with CCDF provider eligibility standards in
accordance with federal requirements for health and safety.
SECTION 11. IC 12-17.2-7.2-2.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.268-2019,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. As used in this chapter, "extended enrollment
period" refers to the period set forth by the office beginning not later
than June 1 of each calendar year. "expansion fund" refers to the
prekindergarten expansion grant fund established by section 15 of
this chapter.
SECTION 12. IC 12-17.2-7.2-2.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 2.5. As used in this chapter, "limited eligibility
child" refers to an individual who:
(1) is at least four (4) years of age and less than five (5) years of
age on August 1 of the state fiscal year for which a
prekindergarten voucher is sought for the individual under the
prekindergarten program;
(2) is a resident of Indiana or otherwise has legal settlement in
Indiana, as determined under IC 20-26-11;
(3) receives qualified early education services from an eligible
provider, as determined by the office;
(4) has a parent or guardian who agrees to ensure that the child
meets the attendance requirements determined by the office;
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


(5) has a parent or guardian who participates in a parental
engagement and involvement component provided by the eligible
provider;
(6) is a member of a household with an annual income that does
not exceed one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal
poverty level;
(7) meets the requirements of section 7.2(b) and 7.2(c) of this
chapter; and
(8) is not an eligible child or a child of a child care employee.
SECTION 13. IC 12-17.2-7.2-4.7, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.246-2023, SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. As used in this chapter, "fund"
"prekindergarten fund" refers to the prekindergarten program fund
established by section 13.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 14. IC 12-17.2-7.2-5.7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 5.7. As used in this chapter, "priority enrollment
period" refers to the period set forth by the office beginning not later
than April 1 of each calendar year, except for calendar year 2024,
during which the priority enrollment period may begin later than April
1, 2024.
SECTION 15. IC 12-17.2-7.2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "qualified early
education services" refers to a program of early education services that:
(1) is provided by an eligible provider to
(A) an eligible child;
(B) a limited eligibility child; or
(C) a child of a child care employee;
(2) includes a parental engagement and involvement component
in the delivery of early education services that is based on the
requirements and guidelines established by the office;
(3) administers the kindergarten readiness assessment adopted by
the state board of education;
(4) aligns with the early learning development framework for
prekindergarten approved by the department of education; and
(5) meets the design parameters for inclusion in the longitudinal
study described in section 12 of this chapter, as determined by the
office.
SECTION 16. IC 12-17.2-7.2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The prekindergarten program is established
to provide:
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


(1) prekindergarten vouchers for qualified early education
services in a manner consistent with how funds are distributed
under the CCDF child care voucher program; and
(2) grants for expansion plans as described in section 7.4(a)(2) of
this chapter.
(b) The office shall administer the prekindergarten program. The
prekindergarten program may include:
(1) eligible providers in Indiana; and
(2) potential eligible providers or existing eligible providers as
described in section 7.4 of this chapter.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2020, the total number of prekindergarten
vouchers provided during the immediately preceding state fiscal year
shall include the number of prekindergarten vouchers issued under a
preschool program established in March 2015 that operates in a
consolidated city.
(d) The prekindergarten program includes eligible providers in any
county in Indiana.
(e) Subject to the requirements of this chapter, the office shall
determine:
(1) the eligibility requirements, application process, and selection
process for providing prekindergarten vouchers under the
prekindergarten program and awarding grants under section 7.4
of this chapter;
(2) the administration and reporting requirements for:
(A) eligible providers; and
(B) potential eligible providers or existing eligible providers;
participating in the prekindergarten program; and
(3) with the assistance of the early learning advisory committee,
an appropriate outcomes based accountability system for:
(A) eligible providers; and
(B) potential eligible providers or existing eligible providers.
(f) The office shall, subject to the availability of funding, determine
the number of eligible children, limited eligibility children, and
children of child care employees who will participate in the
prekindergarten program.
SECTION 17. IC 12-17.2-7.2-7.2, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.2. (a) For an eligible child to qualify for a
prekindergarten voucher under this chapter, the eligible child must
reside with a parent or guardian who is working or attending a job
training or an educational program.
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


(b) For a limited eligibility child to qualify for a prekindergarten
voucher under this chapter, the limited eligibility child must reside with
a parent or guardian who:
(1) is working or attending a job training or an educational
program; or
or
(2) receives Social Security Disability Insurance, Supplemental
Security Income benefits, or disability benefits from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs.
(c) (b) Before the office may provide a prekindergarten voucher to
an eligible child a limited eligibility child, or a child of a child care
employee under this chapter, the office shall require that a parent or
guardian of the child agree to the following:
(1) The child will attend the prekindergarten program of an
eligible provider selected by the parent or guardian for the full
duration of the prekindergarten program year.
(2) The parent or guardian will not transfer to another
prekindergarten program during the prekindergarten program
year.
(3) The child will attend the prekindergarten program at least
eighty-five percent (85%) of the days that the prekindergarten
program is provided.
(4) The parent or guardian will allow the child to participate in an
external evaluation conducted by researchers, including the
kindergarten readiness assessment and measuring of
developmental and academic progress.
(5) The parent or guardian will participate in family engagement
and involvement activities offered by the selected prekindergarten
program, including meetings with the child's teacher to discuss
the child's progress or any other conference concerning the child
that is requested by the eligible provider.
(6) The parent or guardian will complete the necessary forms for
the child to receive a student test number from the department of
education.
(7) The parent or guardian will send the child to kindergarten.
(8) The parent or guardian will read to the child each week.
(9) Any other condition the office determines is appropriate.
(d) Priority shall be given to a child of a child care employee under
this section.
(e) (c) Priority may be given to an eligible or limited eligibility child
under this section if a parent or guardian of the eligible or limited
eligibility child is:
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


(1) involved in activities that improve the parent's or guardian's
education; or
(2) involved in job training.
SECTION 18. IC 12-17.2-7.2-7.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.3. The office shall require, for an eligible
provider to enroll in the prekindergarten program, that the eligible
provider agree to the following:
(1) Comply on a continuing basis with the requirements under this
chapter and rules for participation established by the office.
(2) Maintain eligibility under this chapter throughout the
prekindergarten program year.
(3) Report immediately any changes in eligibility status to the
office, including the eligible provider's loss of national or regional
accreditation.
(4) Participate in any training and mandatory meetings required
by the office.
(5) Participate in all onsite visits conducted by the office,
including fiscal auditing activities with regard to the
prekindergarten program and prekindergarten program activity
monitoring.
(6) Allow the family of an eligible child a limited eligibility child,
or a child of a child care employee enrolled in the prekindergarten
program of the eligible provider to visit at any time the
prekindergarten program is in operation.
(7) Maintain accurate online attendance records through the
attendance portal for eligible children limited eligibility children,
and children of child care employees enrolled in the
prekindergarten program and submit attendance records as
required by the office.
(8) Offer parental engagement and involvement activities in the
prekindergarten program of the eligible provider in alignment
with the family engagement framework adopted by the early
learning advisory committee established by IC 12-17.2-3.8-5.
(9) Complete, within the period established by the office, the
Indiana early childhood family engagement toolkit, including the
family engagement self-assessment, adopted by the early learning
advisory committee.
(10) Share information on the family engagement self-assessment
described in subdivision (9) as required by the office.
(11) Participate in research studies as required by the office.
(12) Enforce minimum attendance requirements of at least
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


eighty-five percent (85%) of the days that the prekindergarten
program of the eligible provider is offered to an eligible child. a
limited eligibility child, or a child of a child care employee.
(13) Inform the office that an eligible child a limited eligibility
child, or a child of a child care employee has withdrawn from the
prekindergarten program of the eligible provider not later than
five (5) days after the child is withdrawn.
(14) That retroactive repayment to the state may be required or
future payments may be adjusted as a result of the withdrawal of
an eligible child a limited eligibility child, or a child of a child
care employee or changes in the law.
(15) Maintain records of participation by the family of an eligible
child a limited eligibility child, or a child of a child care employee
in family engagement activities and submit records as required by
the office.
(16) Promote the social, emotional, and behavioral health of an
eligible child a limited eligibility child, or a child of a child care
employee and eliminate or severely limit the use of expulsion,
suspension, and other exclusionary discipline practices.
(17) Use the exclusionary discipline practices described in
subdivision (16) only as a last resort in extraordinary
circumstances when there is a determination of a serious safety
threat that cannot otherwise be reduced or eliminated by the
provision of reasonable modifications.
(18) Inform and receive approval from the office before the
eligible provider expels, suspends, or uses other exclusionary
discipline practices.
(19) Assist a parent or guardian, upon request by the parent or
guardian, in obtaining information from, referral to, or both
information from and referral to, the public school that serves the
attendance area in which the parent or guardian resides for an
educational evaluation and determination of eligibility for special
education services if developmental delays or reasons to suspect
a disability are observed by the parent, guardian, or teacher of an
eligible child a limited eligibility child, or a child of a child care
employee during the prekindergarten program year.
SECTION 19. IC 12-17.2-7.2-7.4, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.246-2023, SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.4. (a) To qualify as
a potential eligible provider or existing eligible provider, an applicant
must:
(1) provide an expansion plan to the office that details the
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


potential eligible provider's or existing eligible provider's plan to:
(A) increase the capacity of providers of qualified early
education services to serve a greater number of eligible or
limited eligibility children;
(B) increase the number of providers of qualified early
education services; or
(C) increase the capacity as described in clause (A) and
increase the number as described in clause (B);
(2) comply with the agreement with the office concerning the plan
under subdivision (1) and the use of a grant awarded under this
chapter;
(3) agree:
(A) to operate as an eligible provider; or
(B) that the applicant intends to operate as an eligible
provider;
(4) agree that the applicant will not use any grant funds awarded
under this section for capital expenditures; and
(5) comply with any other standards and procedures established
under this chapter.
(b) Subject to subsections subsection (c), and (d), the office may
award a grant to an applicant that meets the requirements of subsection
(a).
(c) The office may not use more than a total of twenty percent (20%)
of the money in the fund each state fiscal year:
(1) for grants awarded under this chapter to potential eligible
providers and existing eligible providers for expansion plans; and
(2) to meet any state match amounts required for a federal grant
described in subsection (f).
(d) (c) The office may not award grant funds under this section to an
applicant for any of the following:
(1) The purchase of land or a building.
(2) The construction or expansion of a building.
(e) (d) If a potential eligible provider or existing eligible provider
fails to:
(1) use the grant funds in accordance with the expansion plan
described in subsection (a); or
(2) comply with the agreement entered into with the office under
subsection (a);
the potential eligible provider or existing eligible provider shall repay
to the office the total amount of the grant awarded to the potential
eligible provider or existing eligible provider under this chapter.
(f) (e) The office may use money in the expansion fund that is
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


allocated for expansion plans under this section for a state fiscal year
to meet any state match amounts required for a federal grant if the
purpose of the federal grant is that the grant money be used for
increasing:
(1) the capacity;
(2) the number; or
(3) both the capacity and number;
of providers of early education services for children four (4) years of
age.
SECTION 20. IC 12-17.2-7.2-7.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.8. (a) The office shall make random onsite
inspections each year, as determined necessary by the office, at the
facility of:
(1) an eligible provider that receives a prekindergarten voucher
under this chapter; or
(2) a potential eligible provider or existing eligible provider that
receives a grant under section 7.4 of this chapter.
(b) The office may determine that an eligible provider is not eligible
to receive a prekindergarten voucher under the prekindergarten
program or that a potential eligible provider or existing eligible
provider is not eligible to receive a grant under section 7.4 of this
chapter if the eligible provider or the potential eligible provider or
existing eligible provider:
(1) fails to comply with this chapter; or
(2) refuses to allow, during normal business hours, the office or
an agent of the office to inspect the facility at which the eligible
provider or potential eligible provider or existing eligible provider
operates a child care program for eligible children. limited
eligibility children, or children of child care employees.
SECTION 21. IC 12-17.2-7.2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The office shall determine
(1) which applicants shall be provided a:
(A) prekindergarten voucher under this chapter; or
(B) grant under section 7.4 of this chapter; and
(2) subject to subsection (b) and to the availability of funding, the
amount of each prekindergarten voucher or grant.
(b) At least five percent (5%) but not more than fifty percent (50%)
of the:
(1) tuition for eligible or limited eligibility children under the
prekindergarten program; or
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


(2) expansion plan described in section 7.4(a) of this chapter;
during the state fiscal year must be paid from donations, gifts, grants,
bequests, and other funds received from a private entity or person, from
the United States government, or from other sources (excluding funds
from a prekindergarten voucher or grant provided under this chapter
and excluding other state funding). The office may receive and
administer grants on behalf of the prekindergarten program. The grants
shall be distributed by the office to fulfill the requirements of this
subsection.
(c) The amount of a prekindergarten voucher provided under the
prekindergarten program to an eligible child, a limited eligibility child,
or a child of a child care employee:
(1) who attends a prekindergarten program full time must equal
at least two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) during the
state fiscal year; and
(2) may not exceed six thousand eight hundred dollars ($6,800)
from state money provided under this chapter during the state
fiscal year.
SECTION 22. IC 12-17.2-7.2-8.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 8.1. (a) If funds are appropriated by the general
assembly, prekindergarten vouchers provided to limited eligibility
children may not exceed:
(1) twenty percent (20%) of the amount appropriated for a
particular state fiscal year if families with children four (4) years
of age are on the waiting list for funds available under the CCDF;
or
(2) forty percent (40%) of the amount appropriated for a
particular state fiscal year if there is no waiting list for children
four (4) years of age for funds available under the CCDF.
(b) During the priority enrollment period, the office shall provide
prekindergarten vouchers to eligible children and children of child care
employees in the prekindergarten program on a first-come, first-served
basis. The office shall date stamp and reserve applications for limited
eligibility children received during the priority enrollment period for
processing during the extended enrollment period.
(c) During the extended enrollment period, the office shall provide
prekindergarten vouchers to eligible children, children of child care
employees, and limited eligibility children in the prekindergarten
program on a first-come, first-served basis to the extent of available
funding and in accordance with the limit established by subsection (a).
SECTION 23. IC 12-17.2-7.2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) The office shall, before November 1 of
each year, submit a report to the governor, the budget committee, the
state board of education, the department of education, and, in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6, the general assembly regarding the
prekindergarten program.
(b) The report under subsection (a) must include the following:
(1) The total number of children who received a prekindergarten
voucher under the prekindergarten program for the immediately
preceding state fiscal year, disaggregated by county.
(2) The total amount of funds budgeted for and spent under the
prekindergarten program during the immediately preceding state
fiscal year.
(3) The balance remaining in the prekindergarten fund and
expansion fund at the end of the immediately preceding state
fiscal year.
SECTION 24. IC 12-17.2-7.2-13.1, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.92-2024, SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.1. The office shall post monthly
on the office's website the total enrollment of and number of
prekindergarten vouchers awarded to
(1) eligible children
(2) limited eligibility children; and
(3) children of child care employees;
for each county that participates in the prekindergarten program.
SECTION 25. IC 12-17.2-7.2-13.5, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.92-2024, SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.5. (a) The prekindergarten
program fund is established to do the following:
(1) Provide prekindergarten vouchers to eligible children limited
eligibility children, and children of child care employees for
qualified early education services under this chapter.
(2) Carry out the longitudinal study described in section 12 of this
chapter.
(3) provide grants to potential eligible providers and existing
eligible providers as set forth in section 7.4 of this chapter; and
(4) (3) Make payments to reimburse costs incurred to provide
in-home early education services under IC 12-17.2-7.5 in an
amount that does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000)
each state fiscal year.
(b) The prekindergarten fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated to the prekindergarten fund by the
general assembly; and
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


(2) grants or gifts to the prekindergarten fund.
(c) The prekindergarten fund shall be administered by the office.
(d) The expenses of administering the prekindergarten fund shall
be paid from money in the prekindergarten fund.
(e) Money in the prekindergarten fund is continuously
appropriated for the purposes provided under this article.
(f) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the
prekindergarten fund not currently needed to meet the obligations of
the prekindergarten fund in the same manner as other public funds
may be invested.
SECTION 26. IC 12-17.2-7.2-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The prekindergarten
expansion grant fund is established to provide grants to potential
eligible providers and existing eligible providers as set forth in
section 7.4 of this chapter.
(b) The expansion fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated to the expansion fund by the general
assembly; and
(2) grants or gifts to the expansion fund.
(c) The expansion fund shall be administered by the office.
(d) The expenses of administering the expansion fund shall be
paid from money in the expansion fund.
(e) Money in the expansion fund is continuously appropriated
for the purposes provided under this article.
(f) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the expansion
fund not currently needed to meet the obligations of the expansion
fund in the same manner as other public funds may be invested.
SECTION 27. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) There is
continuously appropriated to the prekindergarten program fund
established by IC 12-17.2-7.2-13.5, as amended by this act, from the
state general fund for the state fiscal year beginning after:
(1) June 30, 2026, and ending before July 1, 2027; and
(2) June 30, 2027, and ending before July 1, 2028;
an amount sufficient to carry out the purposes of the
prekindergarten program fund, as amended by this act.
(b) There is appropriated to the prekindergarten expansion
grant fund established by IC 12-17.2-7.2-15, as added by this act,
from the state general fund the following:
(1) For the state fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2026, and
ending before July 1, 2027, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).
(2) For the state fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2027, and
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152


ending before July 1, 2028, seventy-five million dollars
($75,000,000).
(c) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
2026 IN 1219—LS 6537/DI 152